Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 186A Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System

186A.005.
Definitions for chapter. [Effective January 1, 2024]

As used in this chapter:

“Approved entity” means:

A motor vehicle dealer licensed under KRS Chapter 190 that applies to and is approved by the Transportation Cabinet to facilitate the title application process through the electronic title application and registration system;

A state or federal financial institution chartered under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States as a bank insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), bank holding company, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or a holding company or service corporation subsidiary thereof, or any agent of any of the entities listed in this paragraph;

An owner of a fleet as defined in this section that applies to and is approved by the Transportation Cabinet to facilitate renewal of registration or maintenance of permanent registration under KRS

186A.127

through the electronic title application and registration system; and

A retailer of manufactured homes, mobile homes, or recreational vehicles, as defined in KRS

227.550

, that applies to and is approved by the Transportation Cabinet to facilitate the title application process through the electronic title application and registration system;

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet;

“Electronic title application and registration system” means a system established under KRS

186A.017

by which title applications, title lien statements, other supporting documents, signatures, and fees are input and transmitted through the title application and registration process in an electronic format;

“Fleet” means:

A group of at least one hundred fifty (150) U-Drive-It vehicles owned by the holder of a U-Drive-It certificate; or

A group of at least ten (10) nonapportioned commercial motor vehicles owned by a company and used for business purposes; and

“Title lien statement” means a document, submitted by a secured party or authorized agent, to the cabinet through any county clerk’s office in the Commonwealth, to note the security interest on the certificate of title, or to amend or terminate a security interest on the certificate of title.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 18, § 1, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.010.
Automated motor vehicle and trailer registration and titling — Transportation Cabinet to develop system.

An automated motor vehicle and trailer registration and titling system shall be developed and implemented as expeditiously as practicable in all counties of the Commonwealth. The automated motor vehicle and trailer registration system shall be designed to enable Kentucky’s county clerks to produce motor vehicle and trailer certificates of registration in their offices, and certificates of title in Frankfort, by automated means utilizing telecommunication terminals and associated devices supplied by the Commonwealth, to inhibit registration and transfer of stolen motor vehicles or trailers, to improve the capability of detecting and recovering such vehicles, to ensure development of a common vehicle information database to improve efficiency in auditing motor vehicle usage tax, license fee collections, and in collecting personal property tax to provide information to the traffic record system, and to provide improved security interest protection to potential creditors throughout Kentucky while simultaneously reducing the number of forms that must be processed and stored each year in Kentucky.

The Transportation Cabinet is hereby directed to, as expeditiously as practicable, develop an automated motor vehicle and trailer registration and titling system, having, as a minimum, the capabilities or functions described in this chapter, and to acquire and assure the installation of such equipment or services as are necessary to enable the system as described in this chapter to be operated in all counties of the Commonwealth.

All departments of state government affected by the system are hereby directed to cooperate with the Transportation Cabinet for purposes of assuring orderly implementation of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 133, § 22; 1982, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.015.
Automated motorboat registration and titling — Agencies to implement system.

Except as provided for in KRS

235.050

, the titling and registration of motorboats as defined in KRS

235.010

shall be administered through the automated motor vehicle and trailer registration and titling system developed and implemented under the provisions of KRS

186A.010

.

The Transportation Cabinet, the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the Department of Revenue, and all other agencies of state government affected by the system are hereby directed to cooperate in the orderly implementation of this system.

The Transportation Cabinet, as far as practicable, and not inconsistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 235, shall promulgate administrative regulations requiring the procedures for boat titling and registration to be consistent with motor vehicle titling and registration. These administrative regulations may pertain but shall not be limited to the following:

Conditions and characteristics of certificate of title forms;

Comparison and identification of hull identification numbers;

Application for title or registration;

Processing of title applications;

Form of certificate of title;

Notation of security interests or title;

Title lien statements;

Transfer of boat ownership;

Duplicate certificate of title or registration; and

Salvage titles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 163, § 3, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 289, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 608, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 237, effective July 15, 2010.

186A.017.
Electronic title application and registration system — Application by approved entity — Contracts with third parties — Fees — Administrative regulations. [Effective January 1, 2024]

The cabinet shall establish an electronic title application and registration system which allows the submission of the required forms and signatures electronically in lieu of the paper title application process.

The electronic title application and registration system established under this section shall:

Collect all the necessary information required under KRS

186A.060

;

Collect and electronically transmit all fees imposed under KRS

186.040

,

186.050

,

186.162

, and

186A.130

, any fees imposed under subsection (6) of this section, and the motor vehicle use tax levied under KRS

138.460

;

Accept electronic signatures which satisfy the requirements of KRS

369.101

to

369.120

; and

Transmit the information in a secure manner.

An approved entity that wishes to use the electronic title application and registration system shall transmit all application documents, required electronic signatures, and fees through the system to the county clerk of the county in which either the purchaser of the vehicle resides or the motor vehicle dealer selling the vehicle is located. A county clerk who receives an application transmitted through the system shall, by 3 p.m. the next business day, either:

Accept the application and forward it to the cabinet; or

Reject the application and return it to the approved entity.

An entity that wishes to become an approved entity for the purposes of this chapter shall submit an application to the cabinet, along with a one hundred fifty dollar ($150) application fee. If approved, the entity shall pay an annual registration fee to the cabinet. All fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the road fund.

The cabinet shall enter into contracts with qualified third-party providers to integrate with AVIS and other systems to provide software and programs to approved entities to facilitate electronic vehicle registration, titling, and filing of title lien statements. A third party that contracts with the cabinet under this section may act on behalf of the cabinet and county clerks in receiving, processing, and transmitting to the county clerk title and registration applications, title lien statements, and related documents and fees.

Any agreement with the cabinet and a third-party provider under subsection (5) of this section shall authorize an online transaction fee to be charged by the third-party provider to an approved entity. A motor vehicle dealer licensed under KRS Chapter 190 who uses the electronic title application and registration system to file the documentation necessary to obtain a certificate of title or registration for the purchaser of a vehicle shall collect from the purchaser any fees charged for the transaction by the third-party provider. The dealer shall remit fees collected under this subsection to the county clerk through the electronic title application and registration system. Any transaction fee charged under this subsection shall be listed separately on the buyer’s order and identified as “on-line system filing fee.”

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish qualifications for approved entities and procedures for the electronic title application and registration system.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 18, § 2, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.020.
Cabinet authorized to promulgate administrative regulations and institute programs.

The Transportation Cabinet shall have any and all necessary power and authority, subject to appropriate provision of the statutes, to promulgate administrative regulations and institute such programs as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 133, § 22; 1998, ch. 128, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

186A.025.
Responsibility and authority for administration and support of system.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have full responsibility and authority for day-to-day administration of the automated system described by this chapter; and

May request the assistance of any cabinet or department of state government in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall assure, to the extent feasible, twenty-four (24) hour, year-round information support to the Department of Kentucky State Police, and to other law enforcement agencies state and nationwide, regarding vehicles registered and, when required, titled in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 506, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 21, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 609, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 201, effective June 26, 2007.

186A.030.
Computation and collection of motor vehicle and trailer ad valorem taxes.

In order to improve collection of personal property (ad valorem) taxes associated with motor vehicles and trailers, the Department of Vehicle Regulation, in cooperation with the Department of Revenue, shall:

Ensure that the automated system provided by this chapter is capable of properly assigning a value for each vehicle registered in a county, utilizing a value reference manual in machine readable form approved by the Department of Revenue, and a manually entered value for vehicles not shown in such “manual.”

Promptly study the feasibility of computing personal property (ad valorem) taxes associated with motor vehicles or trailers, and producing tax bills or notices of taxes due in such regard, and if shown feasible to its satisfaction, implement such capability, or any part thereof, as expeditiously as practicable.

Ensure that the automated system is capable of receiving the record of a lien for unpaid personal property (ad valorem) taxes associated with an owner of a motor vehicle or trailer. No motor vehicle dealer shall be responsible for the payment of a tax lien on a motor vehicle which is received as trade-in or otherwise obtained by the dealer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 113, § 10, effective March 28, 1988; 2005, ch. 85, § 610, effective June 20, 2005.

186A.035.
Motor vehicle registration by birth month of owner — Joint tenancy with right of survivorship for motor vehicle jointly owned by husband and wife — Clerk’s fee — Renewal of registration.

All motor vehicles, including motorcycles, with a gross vehicular weight of six thousand (6,000) pounds or less, first registered, or for which the registration is renewed in this state on or after January 1, 1983, shall be placed in a system of year-round registration based upon the birth month of the owner, in order to distribute the work of registering motor vehicles as uniformly as practicable throughout the twelve (12) months of the year.

If the owner of a motor vehicle is other than an individual, the month in which the owning entity came into being shall be used for purposes of this section. If a motor vehicle is jointly owned, the owners shall indicate to the county clerk the birth month of one (1) of them to be used for purposes of this section. In addition, if a motor vehicle is jointly owned by a husband and wife, the ownership shall exist as a joint tenancy with right of survivorship, unless the registration expressly states to the contrary and gives an alternative specific status. Upon the death of one (1) of the spouses, the jointly-owned vehicle shall transfer to the surviving spouse free from payment of any state-required transferral fees.

The certificate of registration and license plate issued for a motor vehicle first registered, renewed, or titled in this state on or after January 1, 1983, shall be valid, unless revoked in accordance with KRS

186A.040

or canceled by the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 186 or this chapter, upon payment of the required fee, for a period beginning on the first day of the month of the year in which registration is applied for, and expiring on the last day of the next birth month of the owner following the month during which registration is applied for. Upon the owner’s request, and after payment of the proper prorated fee, an owner may obtain a certificate of registration and license plate valid through the last day of his second birth month following the month and year in which he applied for a certificate of registration. Any transaction relating to registration or registration renewal which would cause an unexpired Kentucky motor vehicle license plate to be surrendered shall have that unexpired fee prorated or credited against any additional fee required by a subsequent registration.

After a motor vehicle has been initially placed in the system of year-round registration, the owner shall renew the registration annually during the owner’s birth month, by making application to the county clerk and paying the fee required for twelve (12) consecutive months of registration, which shall take effect on the first day of the month succeeding the owner’s birth month and shall expire on the last day of the owner’s next birth month. The county clerk shall be entitled to a registration fee of two dollars ($2) for each registration, or if the registration exceeds a twelve (12) month period, the clerk shall receive a fee of three dollars ($3).

At least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of the registration of any motor vehicle previously registered in the Commonwealth as provided by subsection (1) of this section, the owner of the vehicle shall be notified by mail on the same notice required by KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. Nonreceipt of the notice required by this subsection shall not constitute a defense to any registration-related offense.

Any owner who fails to renew the registration of a motor vehicle during the month in which the previous registration expired shall, if he applies for renewal of the registration in some later month, pay the same fees that would have been required if the registration had been renewed in the month which the previous registration expired.

Fees which must be prorated in carrying out the intent of this section shall be prorated on the basis of twelfths of the annual registration fee. Any vehicle which is registered at any time during a month shall pay the fee required for that whole month plus any additional months of registration purchased consistent with the intent of the section.

The county clerk shall ensure that the certificate of registration issued to an owner displays the month and year in which the registration period begins and the month and year of its expiration, and shall issue to the owner a decal or decals corresponding to the month and year of expiration shown in the certificate of registration which shall be placed upon the corresponding license plate by the owner in the manner required by administrative regulations of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 37, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 363, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 241, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 97, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 442, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 565, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 442 and 565 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The terms registration year and registration period are synonymous; the registration year is, therefore, determined by the birth date of the owner. The legislative intent is that a registration period or year must commence on the birth month of the owner; therefore, when there is a new owner, a new registration period begins, based on the birth month of the new owner.

OAG 83-47

.

The termination of a registration period is marked by the occurrence of either one of two contingencies whichever happens first: the birth month of the owner of the vehicle or the transfer of ownership of the vehicle; under this interpretation, the new owner is not entitled to be credited with the unexpired time of the previous owner’s registration.

OAG 83-47

.

186A.040.
Motor vehicle insurance data included in system database — Notification of cancellation, nonrenewal of policy, or absence of vehicle identification number to insured and county attorney — Revocation of license — Certified records to county attorney — Information not subject to Kentucky Open Records Act.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall provide and receive information on the insurance status of vehicles registered in the Commonwealth of Kentucky pursuant to KRS

304.39-087

and

304.39-085

. The department shall provide appropriate insurance information to the Commonwealth Office of Technology for inclusion in the AVIS database to assist in identifying uninsured motor vehicles.

Upon notification to the Department of Vehicle Regulation from an insurance company of cancellation or nonrenewal of a policy pursuant to KRS

304.39-085

, or on and after January 1, 2006, if the vehicle identification number (VIN) of a personal motor vehicle does not appear in the database created by KRS

304.39-087

for two (2) consecutive reporting months, the department shall immediately make a determination as to the notification of the insured. Notification to the insured shall state that the insured’s policy is no longer valid and that the insured shall have thirty (30) days to show proof of insurance to the county clerk. The department shall further inform the insured that if evidence of insurance is not received within thirty (30) days the department shall revoke the registration of the motor vehicle until:

The person presents proof of insurance to the county clerk and pays the reinstatement fee required by KRS

186.180

;

The person presents proof in the form of an affidavit stating, under penalty of perjury as set forth in KRS

523.030

, that the failure to maintain motor vehicle insurance on the vehicle specified in the department’s notification is the result of the inoperable condition of the motor vehicle;

The person presents proof in the form of an affidavit stating, under penalty of perjury as set forth in KRS

523.030

, that the failure to maintain motor vehicle insurance on the vehicle specified in the department’s notification is the result of the seasonal nature of the vehicle. The affidavit shall explain that when the vehicle is out of dormancy and when the seasonal use of the vehicle is resumed, the proper security will be obtained; or

The person presents proof in the form of an affidavit stating, under penalty of perjury as set forth in KRS 523.030, that he or she requires a registered motor vehicle in order to carry out his or her employment and that the motor vehicle that he or she drives during the course of his or her employment meets the security requirement of Subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304. The person shall also declare in the affidavit that he or she will operate a motor vehicle only in the course of his or her employment. If a person has his or her motor vehicle registration revoked in accordance with this subsection three (3) times within any twelve (12) month period, the revocations shall constitute a violation of KRS

304.39-080

. The department shall notify the county attorney to begin prosecution for violation of subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall be responsible for notification to the appropriate county attorney that a motor vehicle is not properly insured, if the insured does not respond to notification set out by paragraph (a) of this subsection. The notice that the department gives to the county attorney in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include a certified copy of the person’s driving record which shall include:

The notice that the department received from an insurance company that a person’s motor vehicle insurance policy has been canceled or has not been renewed; and

A dated notice that the department sent to the person requiring the person to present proof of insurance to the county clerk.

Upon notification by the department, a county attorney shall immediately begin prosecution of the person who had his or her motor vehicle registration revoked three (3) times within any twelve (12) month period in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The certified copies sent by the department described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of KRS

304.39-080

.

If the insured provides proof of insurance to the clerk within the thirty (30) day notification period, the department shall ensure action is taken to denote a valid insurance policy is in force.

In developing the mechanism to electronically transfer information pursuant to KRS

304.39-087

, the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall consult with the commissioner of the Department of Insurance and insurers of personal motor vehicles to adopt a standardized system of organizing, recording, and transferring the information so as to minimize insurer administrative expenses. The commissioner of vehicle regulation shall to the maximum extent possible utilize nationally recognized electronic data information systems such as those developed by the American National Standards Institute or the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information obtained by the department pursuant to KRS

304.39-087

shall not be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.872

to

61.884

, and shall not be disclosed, used, sold, accessed, utilized in any manner, or released by the department to any person, corporation, or state and local agency, except in response to a specific individual request for the information authorized pursuant to the federal Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18

U.S.C. secs. 2721

et seq. The department shall institute measures to ensure that only authorized persons are permitted to access the information for the purposes specified by this section. Persons who knowingly release or disclose information from the database created by KRS 304.39-087 for a purpose other than those described as authorized by this section or to a person not entitled to receive it shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for each release or disclosure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 129, § 6, effective January 1, 1985; 1996, ch. 341, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 442, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 319, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 506, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 130, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 611, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 238, effective July 15, 2010.

186A.042.
Prohibition against licensing of personal motor vehicles without listing of vehicle identification numbers — Exceptions — Submission of paper or electronic proof of insurance card to county clerk.

On and after January 1, 2006, a county clerk shall not process an application for, nor issue, a:

Kentucky title and registration or renewal of registration;

Replacement plate, decal, or registration certificate;

Duplicate registration;

Transfer of registration; or

Temporary tag;

for any personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS

304.39-087

(1) if AVIS does not list the vehicle identification number of the personal motor vehicle as an insured vehicle, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

If AVIS does not list the vehicle identification number of the personal motor vehicle as an insured vehicle, the county clerk may process the application if:

The applicant has an insurance card in paper or electronic format that indicates the required security is currently in full force on the personal motor vehicle if the paper or electronic proof of insurance card was effective no more than forty-five (45) days before the application is submitted to the county clerk; or

The owner of the motor vehicle is serving in the Armed Forces outside of Kentucky, and the owner provides an affidavit by the provost marshal of the base where the owner is stationed stating that the motor vehicle is covered by security as required by Subtitle 39 of KRS Chapter 304.

This section shall not apply to any transactions involving Kentucky motor vehicle dealers who are licensed as required by KRS

190.030

.

For purposes of this section:

An insurance card in an electronic format means the display of an image subject to immediate download or transmission from the applicant’s insurer or agent to the applicant on any portable electronic device, including a cellular phone or any other type of portable electronic device, but shall not include a photographic copy of a paper insurance card on a portable electronic device; and

The county clerk may require the applicant to e-mail the electronic insurance card to the clerk, and the clerk may print a copy of the card for the clerk’s records.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 130, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 24, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 83, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

186A.045.
Video telecommunication equipment in all counties.

The Transportation Cabinet shall ensure that each county in the Commonwealth is equipped with at least one (1), or more than one (1), as workload dictates, video telecommunications terminal and associated devices, linked to a computer in Frankfort maintained by the Commonwealth, and capable of enabling the county clerks to produce certificates of registration in their offices, and certificates of title in Frankfort, in a manner consistent with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Survey of Law, Nowka, Commercial Law, 72 Ky. L.J. 337 (1983-84).

186A.050.
Conditions and characteristics of certificate of title and computer generated forms.

The certificate of title and computer generated forms required by this chapter shall be designed and printed to make difficult and to facilitate detection of counterfeit likenesses or fraudulent alteration of genuine documents. The bid specifications for the acquisition of the certificate of title blanks shall require, as a minimum:

That bidders have a demonstrable reputation in the printing of currency or securities, and guarantee with an appropriate cash bond that, in addition to any other requirements, the document blanks to be supplied are printed in a secure printing facility, utilizing a combination of the printing process, unique printing plates, paper, and inks to produce high quality documents designed to:

Be readily recognizable as genuine by a layman and by extra visual techniques;

Make extremely difficult the manufacture of counterfeit likenesses by direct engraving, photographic, or color xerographic means;

Visually reveal actual or attempted alteration or erasure by chemical or mechanical means.

That bidders guarantee production of a specific number of uniquely numbered documents with guaranteed accounting for spoilage and a guaranteed list of document numbers supplied and those deleted.

That the documents will be shipped to the Commonwealth by an agreed means to assure minimal risk of theft, loss, or destruction.

That the plates utilized in printing of the blanks will not be utilized for the printing of certificate of title blanks by other than the bidder pursuant to a lawful contract with the Commonwealth.

The department, by administrative regulation, may provide for the production of a certificate of title by electronic means.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 391, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 128, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

186A.055.
System to withhold title until vehicle identification number compared.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation, in cooperation with the Department of Kentucky State Police, shall ensure that the automated vehicle registration and titling system provided for by this chapter will be designed, equipped, and operated so that, under normal conditions, the system will withhold production of a certificate of title until the vehicle identification number of a vehicle for which a title is sought, and when present, its license number has been automatically compared against the Law Information Network Kentucky (LINK) and, unless it refuses to permit such an arrangement, the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) computerized listing of vehicles reported stolen, and a “no stolen report” or its equivalent is received.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 202, effective June 26, 2007.

186A.060.
Department of Vehicle Regulation to develop forms — Reduction of paperwork required. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

The Department of Vehicle Regulation is directed to develop, in cooperation with county clerks, auto dealers, and the Department of Revenue, Department of Insurance, and Department of Kentucky State Police, the forms required to record all information pertinent to the initial registration, or titling and taxation, or transfer of registration or title of a vehicle.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall make every effort to minimize and reduce the amount of paperwork required to apply for, or transfer, a vehicle title. When possible, the title document itself shall be used as the primary form used to effect a transfer of vehicle ownership. The title document shall contain space exclusively reserved for a minimum of two (2) dealer assignments.

When no in-state title exists, forms shall be designed by the department that require only the appropriate and essential information to effect the application for title.

The department shall constantly review the information needs of government agencies and other organizations with the goal of reducing or eliminating unnecessary documentation. Information being sought for application for title relevant to, but not limited to, vehicle identification, owner, buyer, usage tax, county clerk, or inspector shall be set forth by the cabinet in such a way as to promote flexibility in reaching this goal, except that an applicant for a motor vehicle title shall not be required to provide his or her Social Security number as part of the application process.

The use of an electronic medium shall be employed so that forms can be printed by the automated system. Existing statutory language in this chapter and KRS Chapter 186 pertaining to application, signature, forms, or application transfer record may be construed to be electronic in nature at the discretion of the cabinet as provided for by administrative regulation.

Any person who knowingly enters, or attests to the entry of, false or erroneous information in pursuit of a certificate of title shall be guilty of forgery in the second degree.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 405, § 38, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 612, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 203, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 239, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 113, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2024). In codification, a correction has been made to subsection (4)(c) of this statute. 2022 House Bill 288, which created subsection (4)(c), referenced a “federal employee identification number.” However, it is clear from context that the reference was intended to read “Federal Employer Identification Number.” Under the authority of
KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected this reference.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since commercial liens are referred to in KRS

186.045

, 186A.190(3), and former subdivision (14) of this section, the clerk should place these on the certificate of title, if they exist, and then after any commercial liens are listed, the clerk should place the tax liens on the certificate, where space permits, or into the computer.

OAG 84-81

.

If the Automated Vehicle Information System does not have the technical capabilities to store more than two liens and there is no other place to store the information, then obviously the clerk cannot store the additional lien and will be responsible to file them in some other form as well as filing it in the same manner as lis pendens are filed.

OAG 84-81

.

KRS

186.045

, 186A.190(3), and former subdivision (14)(a) of this section prohibit the county clerk from listing more than two liens on the certificate of title in connection with the registration or titling of the vehicles; however, the information in this section required to be filed in conjunction with the liens indicates the legislature intended that its restriction of two liens apply only to commercial liens and there is no such limit to the number of statutory liens such as liens for unpaid property taxes. There is no restriction against placing any type of indicator on the certificate of title that other liens exist.

OAG 84-81

.

It is not legal for an automobile dealer to list his business address as the address of the owner of the vehicle on an application for title and registration, because the mailing address of the owner required by statute must be amenable to reasonable location of the person.

OAG 84-131

.

Under the current registration-title law relating to motor vehicles, the General Assembly by this section and KRS

186.045

,

186A.175

(now repealed) and

186A.190

has made provisions for showing not more than two liens on the certificate of title.

OAG 84-301

.

186A.060.
Department of Vehicle Regulation to develop forms — Reduction of paperwork required — Identification numbers used — False or erroneous information. [Effective January 1, 2024]

The Department of Vehicle Regulation is directed to develop, in cooperation with county clerks, auto dealers, and the Department of Revenue, Department of Insurance, and Department of Kentucky State Police, the forms required to record all information pertinent to the registration, titling, and taxation of a vehicle.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall make every effort to minimize and reduce the amount of paperwork required to apply for, or transfer, a vehicle title. When possible, the title document itself shall be used as the primary form used to effect a transfer of vehicle ownership. The title document shall contain space exclusively reserved for a minimum of two (2) dealer assignments.

When no in-state title exists, forms shall be designed by the department that require only the appropriate and essential information to effect the application for title.

The department shall constantly review the information needs of government agencies and other organizations with the goal of reducing or eliminating unnecessary documentation. Information being sought for application for title relevant to, but not limited to, vehicle identification, owner, buyer, usage tax, county clerk, or inspector shall be set forth by the cabinet in such a way as to promote flexibility in reaching this goal.

An applicant for a motor vehicle title shall be required to provide his or her Kentucky operator’s license number, Kentucky personal identification card number, or Social Security number as part of the application process.

Any vehicle owned by a business that is licensed by the Secretary of State shall be titled using a Federal Employer Identification Number.

The use of an electronic medium shall be employed so that forms can be printed by the automated system. Existing statutory language in this chapter and KRS Chapter 186 pertaining to application, signature, forms, or application transfer record may be construed to be electronic in nature at the discretion of the cabinet as provided for by administrative regulation.

Any person who knowingly enters, or attests to the entry of, false or erroneous information in pursuit of a certificate of title shall be guilty of forgery in the second degree.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 405, § 38, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 128, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 612, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 203, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 239, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 113, § 1, effective January 1, 2014; 2022 ch. 18, § 18, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.065.
Prerequisites for operation of motor vehicles or trailers.

Except as otherwise provided, before the owner of a motor vehicle or trailer may operate it or permit its operation upon the highways of this state, he shall obtain motor vehicle insurance as required by KRS

304.39-080

, a certificate of registration, and a license plate and apply for a certificate of title in his name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 341, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.